Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 5 PETITION, ADJUDICATION, DISPOSITION
19-3-507. Dispositional hearing.

After making an order of adjudication, the court shall hear evidence on the question of the proper disposition best serving the interests of the child and the public. Such evidence shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the social study and
other reports as provided in section 19-1-107.

Prior to any dispositional hearing, the caseworker of the county department assigned to the case shall submit to the court a statement that details the services that were offered to or provided to the family to prevent unnecessary out-of-home placement
of the child and to facilitate the reunification of the child with the family. The statement must contain an explanation of the services or actions that, had such services or actions been available, would have been necessary
to enable the child to remain at home safely. In the alternative, the caseworker may submit a statement as to why no services or actions would have made it possible for the child to remain at home safely. If the child is
part of a sibling group, as defined in section 19-1-103, and the child was not placed with his or her siblings, the caseworker shall submit to the court a statement about whether it continues to be in the best interests
of the child or the children in the sibling group to be placed separately. If the caseworker locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it is presumed
that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group
in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

If one or both of the parents have a disability, reasonable accommodations and modifications, as set forth in the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., and its related amendments and implementing regulations,
are necessary to ensure the treatment plan components are accessible. If applicable, any identified accommodations and modifications must be listed in the report prepared for the dispositional hearing.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If the court has reason to believe that the child may have an intellectual and developmental disability, the court shall refer the child to the community-centered board in
the designated service area where the action is pending for an eligibility determination pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27. If the court has reason to believe that the child may have a behavioral or mental health disorder, the
court shall order a behavioral or mental health disorder prescreening to be conducted in any appropriate place.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]
If the court has reason to believe that the child may have an intellectual and developmental disability, the court shall refer the child to the case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, in the
defined service area where the action is pending for an eligibility determination pursuant to article 6 of title 25.5 or article 10.5 of title 27. If the court has reason to believe that the child may have a behavioral or mental
health disorder, the court shall order a behavioral or mental health disorder prescreening to be conducted in any appropriate place.

Except as provided in section 19-3-508 (1), the court may continue the dispositional hearing, either on its own motion or on the motion of any interested party, for a reasonable period to receive reports or other evidence.

If the hearing is continued, the court shall make an appropriate order for detention of the child or for such child's release in the custody of such child's parents, guardian, or other responsible person or agency under such conditions of supervision
as the court may impose during the continuance.

In scheduling investigations and hearings, the court shall give priority to proceedings concerning a child who is in detention or who has otherwise been removed from such child's home before an order of disposition has been made.

In any case in which the disposition is placement out of the home, except for children committed to the department of human services, the court shall, at the time of placement, set a review within ninety days to determine whether continued placement is
necessary and in the best interests of the child and the community and whether reasonable efforts have been made to return the child to the home or in the case of a sibling group whether it is in the best interests of the children
in the sibling group to be placed together. If the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it shall be presumed that placement of the
entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not
in the best interests of a child or of the children. The judge shall review the family services plan document regarding placement of siblings. Notice of said review shall be given by the court to all parties and to the director
of the facility or agency in which the child is placed and any person who has physical custody of the child and any attorney or guardian ad litem of record. The review shall be conducted in accordance with section 19-1-115 (8)(f).

Parents, grandparents, relatives, or foster parents who have the child in their care for more than three months who have information or knowledge concerning the care and protection of the child may intervene as a matter of right following adjudication
with or without counsel.

A county department of human or social services that placed a child in foster care shall provide the foster parent of the child and any pre-adoptive parent or relative providing care for the child with notice of any administrative review of the child's
case.

Upon the written request of the foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative, notice of a court hearing for the child's case shall be provided in written form and may be provided through the caseworker at the usual periodic meetings with the person
providing care for the child. The notice shall include, at a minimum:

The child's court case number;

The date and time of the next court hearing; and

The name of the magistrate or judge and the court division to which the case has been assigned.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 784, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(2) amended, p. 1398, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 389, § 3, effective April 19; (1) amended, p. 2017, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1)(b) and (4) amended, p. 2684, § 204, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(5) added, p. 1439, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(4) amended, p. 911, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(1)(b) and (4) amended, p. 476, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(1)(b) and (4) amended, p. 2624, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2004:
(5) amended, p. 972, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2006:
(2) amended, p. 1404, § 60, effective August 7.

L. 2008:
(4) amended, p. 1894, § 66, effective August 5.

L. 2017:
(2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1317, § 165, effective May 25.

L. 2018:
(1)(c) added, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1135, § 7, effective April 25; (5)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 422, § 61, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(1)(b) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 732, § 79, effective October 1; (2) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 328, § 12, effective July 1, 2024.

19-3-508. Neglected or dependent child - disposition - concurrent planning.

When a child has been adjudicated to be neglected or dependent, the court may enter a decree of disposition the same day, but in any event it shall do so within forty-five days unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served
by granting a delay. In a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the court shall enter a decree of disposition
within thirty days after the adjudication and shall not grant a delay unless good cause is shown and unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting the delay. It is the intent of the general
assembly that the dispositional hearing be held on the same day as the adjudicatory hearing, whenever possible. If a delay is granted, the court shall set forth the reasons why a delay is necessary and the minimum amount of time
needed to resolve the reasons for the delay and shall schedule the hearing at the earliest possible time following the delay. When the proposed disposition is termination of the parent-child legal relationship, the hearing on termination
must not be held on the same date as the adjudication, and the time limits set forth above for dispositional hearings do not apply. When the proposed disposition is termination of the parent-child legal relationship, the court
may continue the dispositional hearing to the earliest available date for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section and part 6 of this article 3. When the decree does not terminate the parent-child
legal relationship, the court shall approve an appropriate treatment plan that must include but not be limited to one or more of the following provisions of subsections (1)(a) to (1)(d) of this section:

The court may place the child in the legal custody of one or both parents or the guardian, with or without protective supervision, under such conditions as the court deems necessary and appropriate. In a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123,
if the child is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2) and is placed with a parent or guardian who is a named respondent in a petition filed pursuant to section 19-3-502,
the treatment plan shall include a requirement that the family obtain services specific to the family's needs if available in the community where the family resides and based on the social study and reports provided pursuant
to section 19-1-107 (2.5).

The court may place the child in the legal custody of a relative, including the child's grandparent, or other suitable person, with or without protective supervision, under such conditions as the court deems necessary and appropriate. If a child is not
placed with a parent pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), preference may be given by the court for placement with a grandparent pursuant to this paragraph (b) if in the best interests of the child.

The court may place legal custody in the county department of human or social services or a child placement agency for placement in a foster care home or other child care facility. When the child is part of a sibling group and the sibling group is being
placed out of the home, if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it is presumed that placement of the entire sibling
group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the
best interests of a child or of the children.

[Editor's note: See the editor's note (4) following this section.] The court may order that the child be examined or treated by a physician, surgeon, psychiatrist, or psychologist or that the child receive other special care and may place the child in
a hospital or other suitable facility for such purposes; except that the child may not be placed in a mental health facility operated by the department of human services until the child has received a behavioral
or mental health disorder prescreening resulting in a recommendation that the child be placed in a facility for evaluation pursuant to section 27-65-106, or a hearing has been held by the court after notice to all
parties, including the department of human services. An order for an emergency mental health hold must not be entered unless a hearing is held and evidence indicates that the prescreening report is inadequate, incomplete,
or incorrect and that competent professional evidence is presented by a mental health professional that indicates that a behavioral or mental health disorder is present in the child. The court shall make, prior
to the hearing, such orders regarding temporary custody of the child as are deemed appropriate. described in section 27-65-106 or a voluntary application for mental health services pursuant to section 27-65-103
or 27-65-104. The arrangements for care must be completed through the crisis response system or prearranged partnerships with other crisis intervention services.

Placement in any facility operated by the department of human services shall continue for such time as ordered by the court or until the professional person in charge of the child's treatment concludes that the treatment or placement is no longer appropriate.
If placement or treatment is no longer deemed appropriate, the court shall be notified and a hearing held for further disposition of the child within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.
The court shall make, prior to the hearing, such orders regarding temporary custody of the child as are deemed appropriate.

Except where the proposed disposition is termination of the parent-child legal relationship, the court shall approve an appropriate treatment plan involving the child named and each respondent named and served in the action. However, the court may find
that an appropriate treatment plan cannot be devised as to a particular respondent because the child has been abandoned as set forth in section 19-3-604 (1)(a) and the parents cannot be located, or because the child
has been adjudicated as neglected or dependent based upon section 19-3-102 (2), or due to the unfitness of the parents as set forth in section 19-3-604 (1)(b). When the court finds that an appropriate treatment
plan cannot be devised, the court shall conduct a permanency hearing as set forth in section 19-3-702 (1), unless a motion for termination of parental rights has been filed within thirty days after the court's finding.

Repealed.

Before a disposition other than that provided in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section is made, it shall be established by a preponderance of the evidence that a separation of the child from the parents or guardian is in the best interests of
the child.

The court may enter a decree terminating the parent-child legal relationship of one or both parents pursuant to part 6 of this article. Pursuant to section 19-3-602 (1), in a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child is under six years
of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the court shall hear a motion for termination within one hundred twenty days after such motion is filed, and shall not grant a delay unless
good cause is shown and unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting a delay in accordance with the requirements of section 19-3-104.

Upon the entry of a decree terminating the parent-child legal relationship of both parents, of the sole surviving parent, or of the only known parent, the court may:

Vest the county department of human or social services or a child placement agency with the legal custody and guardianship of the person of a child for the purposes of placing the child for adoption; or

Make any other disposition provided in paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of subsection (1) of this section that the court finds appropriate.

In making a disposition pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the court may give preference to making a disposition as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, if in the best interests of the child.

Upon the entry of a decree terminating the parent-child legal relationship of one parent, the court may:

Leave the child in the legal custody of the other parent and discharge the proceedings; or

Make any other disposition provided in subsection (1) of this section that the court finds appropriate.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 520, § 8, effective July 1, 1997.)

In placing the legal custody or guardianship of the person of a child with an individual or a private agency, the court shall give primary consideration to the welfare of the child but shall take into consideration the religious preferences of the child
or of his parents whenever practicable.

If the court finds that placement out of the home is necessary and is in the best interests of the child and the community, the court shall place the child with a relative, including the child's grandparent, as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
(1) of this section, if such placement is in the child's best interests. The court shall place the child in the facility or setting that most appropriately meets the needs of the child, the family, and the community.
In making its decision as to proper placement, the court shall utilize the evaluation for placement prepared pursuant to section 19-1-107. If the court deviates from the recommendations of the evaluation for placement
in a manner that results in a difference in the cost of the disposition ordered by the court and the cost of the disposition recommended in the evaluation, the court shall make specific findings of fact relating
to its decision, including the monthly cost of the placement, if ordered. A copy of such findings shall be sent to the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall report annually to the joint budget committee
and annually to the health, environment, welfare, and institutions committees of the house of representatives and senate of the general assembly on such orders.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) to the contrary, when the child is part of a sibling group and the sibling group is being placed out of the home, if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing,
and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it shall be presumed that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption
may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

The court may grant a new hearing as provided in the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure.

Efforts to place a child for adoption or with a legal guardian or custodian, including identifying appropriate in-state and out-of-state permanent placement options, may be made concurrently with reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify the family.

When entering a decree placing the child in the legal custody of a relative or placing the child in the legal custody of a county department for placement in a foster care home, the court shall ensure that the child's placement at the time of the hearing
is in the best interests of the child and shall inquire about documentation that the county department or a licensed child placement agency has adequately screened the foster care provider or the family member who is seeking to
care for the child and any adult residing in that home and that all of the criminal history record checks and other background checks have been completed as required pursuant to section 26-6-910 or 19-3-407.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 785, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(1)(b), (3), and (5)(b) amended, p. 265, § 9, effective May 31.

L. 94:
IP(1), (1)(a), IP(4), and (4)(a) amended, p. 2054, § 7, effective July 1; (1)(d) amended, p. 2685, § 205, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(1)(e)(II) repealed, p. 85, § 11, effective March 20; IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, p. 265, § 17, effective July 1; (5)(b) amended, p. 1246, § 116, effective August 7.

L. 97:
IP(1), (1)(e)(I), and (4) amended, p. 520, § 8, effective July 1; (1)(e)(I) and (5)(b) amended, pp. 1439, 1441, §§ 15, 18, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(1)(e)(I) amended and (7) added, p. 1418, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(1)(e)(I) amended, p. 912, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001:
(2) amended, p. 847, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(1)(c) and (5)(b) amended, p. 2625, § 6, effective June 5; IP(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1225, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2007:
(7) amended, p. 1018, § 8, effective May 22.

L. 2010:
(1)(d)(I) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 793, § 46, effective April 29.

L. 2015:
(8) added, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1019, § 11, effective June 2.

L. 2017:
IP(1) and (1)(d)(I) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1317, § 166, effective May 25.

L. 2018:
(1)(c) and (3)(b)(I) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 422, § 62, effective August 8.

L. 2022:
(8) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 836, § 40, effective July 1; (1)(d)(I) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3234, § 39, effective August 10.